Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Powers and Duties of Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks

§ 49-5-61.
Transfer of powers and duties of Wildlife Heritage Committee.

The Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall be the Wildlife Heritage Committee and shall exercise the duties and authority granted to such committee pursuant to Sections 49-5-69 through 49-5-98, and pursuant to any other laws of the State of Mississippi.

Wherever the term “Wildlife Heritage Committee” appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, it shall be construed to mean the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, unless the context clearly means to refer to the former Wildlife Heritage Committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 314; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 39, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§§ 49-5-63 through 49-5-67.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1984, ch. 488, § 340, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§49-5-63. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2]

§49-5-65. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2]

§49-5-67. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2]

§ 49-5-69.
Contracts and agreements.

The commission is hereby authorized to make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the committee under Sections 49-5-61 through 49-5-85, including contracts with any firm, person, corporation, governmental agency or other entity and each and any Mississippi governmental agency is hereby authorized to enter into contracts and otherwise cooperate with the committee to facilitate the purpose of Sections 49-5-61 through 49-5-85.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 40, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-71.
Acquisition and disposition of real and personal property; easements and rights-of-way.

The Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks is hereby authorized to acquire interests in real estate and personal property through purchase, donation, bequest or devise in furtherance of the purposes of Sections 49-5-61 through 49-5-85 and otherwise in accordance with the provisions of law. The commission is authorized to approve land or real estate suitable for such purposes as eligible for the income tax credit authorized under Section27-7-22.22.

Before such real estate is purchased or leased, the fair market value of such real estate shall be determined by the averaging of at least two (2) appraisals by Mississippi Certified General Appraisers. Such appraisals shall be paid for by the State of Mississippi.

The commission is hereby authorized to obtain abstracts and surveys, and to engage the services of attorneys to conduct the above described transactions. The commission is authorized to obtain title insurance on property purchased if, in the opinion of the commission, the best interests of the State of Mississippi would be served.

In order to carry out its management responsibilities over all state lands which are now or may hereafter come under its jurisdiction, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks is authorized to grant easements and rights-of-way over and across any part of such state lands. Such easements and rights-of-way may be granted for such consideration, and upon such terms and conditions, as the department may deem to be in the best interest of the state, consistent with the use of such lands for recreational purposes. Any easement for a utility line shall be granted for that period of time which the department deems to be in the best interest of the management of such lands.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 315; Laws, 1987, ch. 519; Laws, 1992, ch. 313, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 366, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 479, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 503, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2010.

§ 49-5-73.
Employment of personnel.

The commission may employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the commission and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 41, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-75.
Rules and regulations.

The commission may make such rules and regulations, inaugurate such studies and surveys and establish such programs as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of Sections 49-5-61 through 49-5-85.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 42, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-76.
Commission authorized to solicit and receive gifts on behalf of Mississippi Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Foundation.

The Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may solicit and receive gifts, donations, contributions and other monies, including bequests and devises, on behalf of the Mississippi Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Foundation and, upon receipt thereof, shall transfer and remit such gifts, donations, contributions and monies so received to the foundation for its use.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 405, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 2006.).

§ 49-5-77.
Wildlife Heritage Fund; gifts; administration of acquired property.

The commission is hereby empowered and authorized to establish a fund to be known as the Wildlife Heritage Fund to be deposited in an approved state depository and expended by appropriation approved by the Legislature as provided by law. The interest obtained from any investment or deposit of monies in such fund shall be deposited by the commission into such fund.

The commission is empowered and authorized, in addition to such sums as may be appropriated from time to time by the Legislature, to accept from any person, firm, corporation or agency of government, national, state or local any gifts or devise, lands, money for the purpose of acquiring by lease, or purchase any area for hunting or fishing use, outdoor recreation, or for the preservation of any species of wildlife or fish. Such lands and waters as are acquired under the provisions of Sections 49-5-61 through 49-5-85 and Section 49-5-78 shall be under the administration and control of the commission until a proper plan shall be developed for the land or water. The commission shall enter into an agreement with an appropriate agency in the executive branch to develop a plan for the land or water. After the plan is developed, the land or water shall be transferred to the administration and control of the department or other appropriate agency in the executive branch to be managed by the agency according to the plan.

The commission is authorized and empowered to accept and earmark for any purpose, not inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 49-5-61 through 49-5-85, any gift or devise, lands or money from any person, firm, corporation or governmental unit on such terms and conditions as the donor may designate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 434, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 435, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 316; Laws, 1985, ch. 330; Laws, 1989, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 43; Laws, 2003, ch. 404, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2003.).

§ 49-5-78.
Additional hunting and fishing fee for Wildlife Heritage Fund; purchase of hunting and fishing areas.

Included in the hunting and fishing license fees authorized in Section 49-7-8, there shall be collected for each nonresident license and renewal thereof, except nonresident temporary fishing permits, a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00), which shall be paid into the Wildlife Heritage Fund established under the provisions of subsection (1) of Section 49-5-77. The funds generated from such additional fees shall be used from time to time by the commission to purchase, and take title in the name of the State of Mississippi, real estate to be used as hunting and/or fishing areas by the people of the State of Mississippi. In purchasing this real estate, the commission shall have all of the powers, and shall be subject to all of the restrictions prescribed in Sections 29-1-1 and 49-5-71. Transfer of title to any real estate purchased under this section shall be by warranty deed or deeds vesting title in fee simple, excepting mineral rights where necessary, in the name of the State of Mississippi. Any real estate purchased under this section shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of Section 49-5-77 regarding the development of plans for and the management of real estate which is acquired by the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 435, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 463, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 44, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-79.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1984, ch. 488, § 340, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

[En Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2]

§ 49-5-81.
Camping and recreational facilities.

The commission may enter into agreements with the department for the purpose of providing camping and other recreational facilities on any such land acquired under Section 49-5-71.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 434, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 45, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-83.
Expenditures and audit of funds.

Monies expended from the Wildlife Heritage Fund shall be spent only after proper resolution entered upon its minutes by the commission and upon warrants signed by the chairman of the commission and countersigned by the executive director of the department. Such funds shall be audited at any time the Governor shall so direct or by the State Auditor on an annual basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 46, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-85.
Sections cumulative.

The provisions of Sections 49-5-61 to 49-5-85 are cumulative, and no existing provision of law is hereby repealed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 335, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1974).

§ 49-5-86.
Definitions.

For purposes of Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98, the following words and terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context otherwise requires:

“General obligation bonds” means bonds of the State of Mississippi, to the repayment of which, both as to principal and interest, the full faith, credit and taxing power of the State of Mississippi are irrevocably pledged until the principal and interest are paid in full.

“Bond commission” means the State Bond Commission.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Committee” or “Wildlife Heritage Committee” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 317; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 47, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-87.
Commission to take title to certain lands in name of state.

The commission shall have the power and is hereby authorized to purchase and take title in the name of the State of Mississippi, the following described land under the terms and conditions hereinafter provided, to wit:

Land presently owned by the Pascagoula Hardwood Company totaling some thirty-one thousand nine hundred sixteen (31,916) acres, more or less, situated as follows:

Seventeen thousand two hundred seventy-eight (17,278) acres, more or less, in George County, Mississippi; and

Fourteen thousand six hundred twenty-eight (14,628) acres, more or less, in Jackson County, Mississippi.

The purchase price of such land shall not exceed its fair market value of Sixteen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($16,500,000.00) as of December 1, 1975, as determined by three (3) appraisals made by appraisers selected by the commission.

Transfer of title to such property shall be by warranty deed or deeds vesting title in fee simple, excepting mineral rights where necessary, in the name of the State of Mississippi.

The commission is hereby authorized and empowered to exercise on the lands described in subsection (1) of this section the same rights, powers and privileges as authorized and empowered under the provisions of “The Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act,” being Sections 49-5-101 through 49-5-119.

Individual leaseholders of the lands described in subsection (1) of this section, shall not be dispossessed of such lands prior to April 15, 1978, unless found to be in violation of the law and/or land management principles of Sections 49-5-101 through 49-5-119, or any other law, rule or regulation relating to the management of the lands.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 472; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 48, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-88.
Bond issuance authorized for purpose of acquiring aforementioned lands.

The commission shall have power and is hereby authorized, at one time or from time to time, to declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of negotiable general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds to be used exclusively and only for the purpose of acquiring all or any part of the land described in Section 49-5-87, but in no event shall the amount of bonds issued exceed a total of Thirteen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($13,500,000.00).

The State Bond Commission shall not direct the issuance of bonds under the provisions of Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 when appropriations by the Legislature and bonds issued, or requested to be issued, would exceed an aggregate total in excess of Thirteen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($13,500,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 49, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-89.
Bonds; authority of state bond commission; payment; maturities and signatures.

Upon the adoption of a resolution by the commission declaring the necessity for issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 and set forth in Section 49-5-88, the commission shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the State Bond Commission. Upon receipt of same, the State Bond Commission shall, in its discretion, act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. For the payment of said bonds and the interest thereon, the full faith, credit and taxing power of the State of Mississippi are hereby irrevocably pledged. If the Legislature shall find that there are funds available in the General Fund of the Treasury of the State of Mississippi in amounts sufficient to pay maturing principal and accruing interest of said general obligation bonds, and if the Legislature shall appropriate such available funds for the purpose of paying such maturing principal and accruing interest, then the maturing principal and accruing interest of said bonds shall be paid from appropriations made from the General Fund of the Treasury of the State of Mississippi by the Legislature thereof; but if there are not available sufficient funds in the General Fund of the Treasury of the State of Mississippi to pay the maturing principal and accruing interest of said bonds, or if such funds are available and the Legislature should fail to appropriate a sufficient amount thereof to pay such principal and accruing interest as the same becomes due, then and in that event there shall annually be levied upon all taxable property within the State of Mississippi an ad valorem tax at a rate sufficient to provide the funds required to pay the said bonds at maturity and the interest thereon as the same accrues.

Such bonds shall bear date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates, be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times, be redeemable prior to maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission. Provided, however, that such bonds shall mature in annual installments beginning not more than two (2) years from date thereof and extending not more than twenty (20) years from date thereof. Such bonds shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the State Bond Commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. The interest coupons to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of said officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials herein designated to sign the bonds, who were in the office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 4; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 50, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-90.
Bonds; negotiability; exemption from taxation.

All general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi and interest coupons issued under the provisions of Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Uniform Commercial Code of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 5; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1976).

§ 49-5-91.
Bonds; sale; interest.

The State Bond Commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale, and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. The bonds authorized by Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than seven percent (7%) per annum. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. The interest rate of any one (1) maturity shall not exceed seven percent (7%).

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in a multiple of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named.

Notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least two (2) times, the first of which shall be made not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale, and shall be so published in one (1) or more newspapers having a general circulation in the City of Jackson and in one (1) or more other newspapers or financial journals with a large national circulation, to be selected by the state bond commission.

The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98, shall provide that bonds maturing eleven (11) or more years after the date of the issuance of such bonds may, at the option of the State of Mississippi, be called in for payment and redemption in reverse numerical order at the call price named therein and accrued interest, or on the tenth anniversary of the date of issue, or on any interest payment date thereafter prior to maturity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 6; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1976).

§ 49-5-92.
Bonds; wildlife heritage committee land purchase fund.

Upon the issuance and sale of such bonds, the State Bond Commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to a special fund in the state treasury to be known as the “wildlife heritage committee land purchase fund.” The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the land described in Section 49-5-87, which shall include costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds, and shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the committee under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 7; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1976).

§ 49-5-93.
Bonds; rights of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted hereunder or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 8; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1976).

§ 49-5-94.
Bonds; validation.

Such general obligation bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98. Any resolution providing for the issuance of general obligation bonds under the provisions of Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular, special or adjourned meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members.

The bonds authorized under the authority of Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 shall be validated in the chancery court of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district, and other bonds. The necessary papers for such validation proceedings shall be transmitted to the state bond attorney by the secretary of the state bond commission, and the required notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 9; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1976).

§ 49-5-95.
Bonds; legal investments and securities.

All bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 10; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1976).

§ 49-5-96.
Bonds; Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 full and complete authority.

Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers herein granted, but said sections shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state whereunder projects of the character herein defined may be constructed or financed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 11; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1976).

§ 49-5-97.
Bonds; withdrawals from land purchase fund; report of expenditures.

The funds which are transferred from the sale of bonds under Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98 to the special fund in the State Treasury known as the “Wildlife Heritage Committee Land Purchase Fund” may be withdrawn only in the following manner: The funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Finance and Administration, which warrants shall be issued upon requisition by the chairman of the commission pursuant to a resolution adopted by the commission authorizing the requisition.

All expenditures ordered by the commission shall be entered upon its minutes, and the commission shall submit a full report of its work and all the transactions carried on by it and a complete statement of all its expenditures at the next regular session of the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 12; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 12; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 51, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-98.
Bonds; duty of attorney general; costs.

Except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall represent the commission in issuing, selling and validating bonds herein provided for, and the commission may expend any sum not exceeding Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) from the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds authorized hereunder to pay the cost of attorney’s fees, validating, printing, and cost of delivery of bonds authorized under Sections 49-5-86 through 49-5-98.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 471, § 13; Laws, 1976, ch. 417, § 13; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 52; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 49-5-99.
Open access to and use of land managed by commission for recreational hunting; certain limitations; report of acreage managed by commission.

Subject to existing rights, lands managed by the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall be open to access and use for recreational hunting except as limited by the commission for reasons of public safety, homeland security, or as otherwise limited by law.

The commission shall exercise its authority to manage lands in a manner to support, promote and enhance recreational hunting opportunities to the extent authorized by law.

The commission is not required to give preference to hunting over other uses or priorities established by state law.

To the greatest practicable extent, commission land management decisions and actions may not result in any net loss of any acreage available for hunting opportunities that exists on July 1, 2006.

Before January 1 of each year, the commission shall submit to the chairmen of the respective wildlife committees in each house a written report containing:

The acreage managed by the commission that has been closed to recreational hunting during the previous year and the reasons for the closures; and

The acreage managed by the commission that was opened to recreational hunting to compensate for the acreage that was closed during the previous year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 549, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.